New York, session 2025-2026, S6951.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 181 of the general municipal law, is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. No person required to maintain registration under article six-C of 4 the correction law shall operate an automobile for or be employed by any 5 mobile application based transportation network. Such transportation 6 networks shall be required to perform a background check on all employ- 7 ees that shall include the state sex offender registry. 8 § 2. Section 401 of the vehicle and traffic law, is amended by adding 9 a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 10 3-a. Restrictions on license to drive a motor vehicle for a mobile 11 application based transportation network. No person required to maintain 12 registration under article six-C of the correction law shall be permit- 13 ted to maintain a license for purposes of operating any automobile for 14 or be employed by any mobile application based transportation network. 15 Such transportation networks shall be required to perform a background 16 check on all employees that shall include the state sex offender regis- 17 try. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11087-01-5